Washington statutes.
RCW 44.05.020

Definitions. (Effective until January 1, 2026.)

The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise.

(1) "Chief election officer" means the secretary of state.

(2) "Federal census" means the decennial census required by federal law to be prepared by the United States bureau of the census in each year ending in zero.

(3) "Lobbyist" means an individual required to register with the Washington public disclosure commission pursuant to RCW 42.17A.600.

(4) "Plan" means a plan for legislative and congressional redistricting mandated by Article II, section 43 of the state Constitution.

[ 2011 c 60 s 41; 1983 c 16 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 60: See RCW 42.17A.919.

PDFRCW 44.05.020

Definitions. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

The definitions set forth in this section apply throughout this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise.

(1) "Chief election officer" means the secretary of state.

(2) "Federal census" means the decennial census required by federal law to be prepared by the United States bureau of the census in each year ending in zero.

(3) "Lobbyist" means an individual required to register with the Washington public disclosure commission pursuant to RCW 29B.50.010.

(4) "Plan" means a plan for legislative and congressional redistricting mandated by Article II, section 43 of the state Constitution.

[ 2024 c 164 s 528; 2011 c 60 s 41; 1983 c 16 s 2.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2011 c 60: See note following RCW 29B.20.030.